California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
To the extent permitted by federal law and subject to the director’s prior right to recover upon any contractual or legal entitlement or other third-party liability for the cost incurred in rendering care, the provider of services shall remain entitled to recover remaining unpaid charges to the extent that any third party is obligated to pay the charges by reason of the beneficiary’s other contractual entitlement. Any claim shall not be permitted to the extent that the claim would reduce the director’s right to recover pursuant to Section 14124.78.

The provider of services shall be required to notify the department of any potential contractual or legal entitlement or other third-party liability within 60 days of discovery. A provider who has obtained proof of Medi-Cal eligibility and who makes a claim for payment by any third party shall disclose in the claim
 that the patient is a Medi-Cal beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 776, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14025.

(a) Any person who buys or sells a Medi-Cal card, Medi-Cal label, or Medi-Cal beneficiary identification number is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or in the state prison, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person who barters for the purpose of resale or commercial exchange a Medi-Cal card, Medi-Cal label, or Medi-Cal beneficiary identification number is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more
 than one year, or in the state prison, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(c) This section shall not apply to any peace officer or any other person working under the peace officer’s immediate direction, supervision, or instruction while investigating Medi-Cal fraud or other related crimes in the performance of his or her official duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1267, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14026.

(a) It is a misdemeanor for a Medi-Cal beneficiary to furnish, give, or lend his Medi-Cal card or labels to any person other than a provider of service as required under Medi-Cal regulations.

(b) It is a misdemeanor for any person to use a Medi-Cal card other than the one which was issued to him or her to obtain health care services. This subdivision shall not apply to the use of a Medi-Cal card of a family member by another family member if the person using the card is, in fact, eligible under this chapter.

(c) This section shall not apply to any peace officer while investigating Medi-Cal fraud or other crimes in performance of his official duties or to any person working under the peace officer’s immediate direction, supervision, or instruction when such peace officer has been issued a Medi-Cal card pursuant to Section 14026.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14026.5.

(a) The State Director of Health Services may issue Medi-Cal cards to Medi-Cal fraud investigators for the purpose of conducting investigations of Medi-Cal fraud, or a violation of the Medical Practice Act as set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code upon written request to the State Director of Health Services, or his or her designee, from the head of the requesting agency stating the purpose of the investigation. The request shall be based upon a specific complaint or
 information alleging Medi-Cal fraud. The request shall be based upon a specific complaint or information from an outside agency pursuant to its standard procedure for referring cases to another agency where there is suspicion of Medi-Cal fraud.

(b) (1) Upon a complaint by any individual alleging information creating a reasonable suspicion that any person is engaging in Medi-Cal fraud, the State Director of Health Services shall issue Medi-Cal cards for the purpose of conducting investigations of Medi-Cal fraud, or a violation of the Medical Practice Act as set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, upon an order of a magistrate issued upon a showing of reasonable suspicion that the person being investigated has committed or is committing Medi-Cal fraud or a violation of the Medical Practice Act as set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of
 Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code. 

(2) For purposes of this section, “reasonable suspicion” means that a peace officer subjectively entertains such a suspicion and that it is objectively reasonable for him or her to do so. The facts shall be those that would cause any reasonable peace officer in a like position drawing when appropriate on his or her training and experience, to suspect the same criminal activity and the same involvement by the person in question. A showing of reasonable suspicion may be made either by written statement under penalty of perjury or by oral statement taken under oath, recorded and transcribed.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to mean that it is the exclusive method for conducting investigations for Medi-Cal fraud or for violations of the Medical Practice Act as set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of
 Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) The State Department of Health Services shall report to the Legislature every six months commencing June 1, 1981, on the utilization of Medi-Cal cards issued pursuant to this section. The report shall include, among other matters, a description of the types of criminal investigations conducted pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 238.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14027.

(a) The department may designate participating county health service agencies as health care service providers of home nursing services, subject to appropriate statutory licensing and certification requirements.

(b) Any county designated as a health care provider of home nursing services pursuant to subdivision (a) shall act as a fiscal intermediary for the provision of home nursing services and pass through to the licensed individuals rendering those nursing services, in total, all Medi-Cal reimbursements received for those nursing services.

(c) The Medi-Cal reimbursement rate applicable to nursing services reimbursed through a designated county health service agency shall be the current Medi-Cal rate applicable to those services.

(d) For purposes of this section, “designated provider of home nursing services” means any participating county health services agency designated as a provider of home nursing services pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1161, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14028.

(a) (1) In order to ensure appropriate oversight of psychotropic medications prescribed for children, pursuant to Section 2245 of the Business and Professions Code, the department and the State Department of Social Services, pursuant to a data-sharing agreement that shall meet the requirements of all applicable state and federal laws and regulations, shall provide the Medical
 Board of California with information regarding Medi-Cal physicians and their prescribing patterns of psychotropic medications and related services for individuals described in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). The data concerning psychotropic medications and related services shall be drawn from existing data sources maintained by the departments. Every five years, the Medical Board of California, the department, and the State Department of Social Services shall consult and revise the methodology, if determined to be necessary.

(2) At minimum, the department, on an annual basis, shall share with the Medical Board of California data, including, but not limited to, pharmacy claims data for all foster children who are or have been on three or more psychotropic medications for 90 days or more. Prior to the release of this data, personal identifiers such as name, date of birth, address, and social security number shall be
 removed and a unique identifier shall be submitted. For each foster child who falls into these categories, the department shall submit the following information to the board:

(A) A list of the psychotropic medications prescribed.

(B) The start and stop dates, if any, for each psychotropic medication prescribed.

(C) The prescriber’s name and contact information.

(D) The child’s or adolescent’s year of birth.

(E) Any other information that is deidentified and necessary to the Medical Board of California to allow the board to exercise its statutory authority as an oversight entity.

(F) The unit and quantity of the medication and
 the number of days’ supply of the medication.

(b) The Medical Board of California shall contract for consulting services from, if available, a psychiatrist who has expertise and specializes in pediatric care for the purpose of reviewing the data provided to the board pursuant to subdivision (a). The consultant shall consider the treatment guidelines published by the department and the State Department of Social Services when assessing prescribing patterns.

 (c) The Medical Board of California, pursuant to subdivision (a), shall analyze prescribing patterns by population for both of the following:

(1) Children adjudged as dependent children under Section 300 and placed in foster care.

(2) A minor adjudged a ward of the court under Section 601 or 602 who
 has been removed from the physical custody of the parent and placed into foster care.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 840, Sec. 3.   (SB 1174)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14029.

Whenever a request for services authorized pursuant to subdivision (s), (t), or (v) of Section 14132 is made to the department for a child who is being case-managed by the California Children’s Services program, any decision to transfer the child to the home setting shall be made only in consultation with the California Children’s Services program case manager for the child.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 59.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14029.5.

(a) (1) Commencing January 1, 2008, immediately following the issuance of an order of the juvenile court, pertaining to the disposition of a ward of the county, committing that ward to a juvenile hall, camp, or ranch for 30 days or longer, the county juvenile detention facility shall provide the appropriate county welfare department with the ward’s name, his or her scheduled or actual release date, any known information regarding the ward’s Medi-Cal status prior to disposition, and sufficient information, when
 available, for the county welfare department to begin the process of determining the ward’s eligibility for benefits under this chapter, including, if the ward is a minor, contact information for the ward’s parent or guardian, if available.

(2) If the ward is a minor, prior to providing information to the county welfare department pursuant to paragraph (1), the county juvenile detention facility shall notify the parent or guardian, in writing, of its intention to submit the information required by that paragraph to the county welfare department. The parent or guardian shall be given a reasonable time to opt out of the Medi-Cal eligibility determination provided for under this section, in which case the county juvenile detention facility shall not comply with paragraph (1).

(3) For purposes of this section, “ward” means a person in the custody of a county juvenile detention
 facility.

(b) (1) Upon receipt of the information described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and pursuant to the protocols and procedures developed pursuant to subdivision (c), the county welfare department shall initiate an application for any ward not already enrolled in the Medi-Cal program, and determine the individual’s eligibility for benefits under the Medi-Cal program. If the ward is a minor, the county welfare department shall promptly contact the parent or guardian to arrange for completion of the application. If the cooperation of the minor’s parent or guardian is necessary to complete the application, but the parent or guardian fails to cooperate in completing the application, the county welfare department shall deny the application in accordance with due process requirements. The county shall expedite the application of a ward who, according to the information provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (a), is scheduled to be released in fewer than 45 days.

(2) If the county welfare department determines that the ward does not meet the eligibility requirements for the Medi-Cal program, the county welfare department, with the consent of the ward’s parent or guardian, if the ward is a minor, shall forward the ward’s information to the appropriate entity to determine eligibility for the Healthy Families Program, or other appropriate health coverage program, as determined by the department.

(3) If the county welfare department determines that a ward meets eligibility requirements for the Medi-Cal program, the county shall provide sufficient documentation to enable the ward to obtain necessary medical care upon his or her release from custody.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340)
 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations, as necessary, to implement this section in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) The department shall seek any federal waivers necessary for the implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 546, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14029.8.

Section 124260 of the Health and Safety Code shall not apply to the receipt of benefits under the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 503, Sec. 2.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14029.91.

(a) The department shall require all managed care plans contracting with the department to provide Medi-Cal services to provide language assistance services to limited-English-proficient (LEP) Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are mandatorily enrolled in managed care in the following manner:

(1) (A) Oral interpretation services shall be provided in any language on a 24-hour basis at key points of contact.

(B) Oral interpretation services shall be provided by an interpreter that, at a minimum, meets all of the following qualifications:

(i) Demonstrated proficiency in speaking and understanding both spoken English and the
 language spoken by the LEP beneficiary.

(ii) The ability to interpret effectively, accurately, and impartially, both receptively and expressly, to and from the language spoken by the LEP beneficiary and English, using any necessary specialized vocabulary, terminology, and phraseology.

(iii) Adherence to generally accepted interpreter ethics principles, including client confidentiality.

(C) A managed care plan shall not require an LEP beneficiary to provide the beneficiary’s own interpreter or rely on a staff member who does not meet the qualifications described in subparagraph (B) to communicate directly with the LEP beneficiary.

(D) A managed care plan shall not rely on an adult or minor child accompanying the LEP beneficiary to interpret or facilitate
 communication except under either of the following circumstances:

(i) In an emergency, as defined by the department, and an interpreter who meets the qualifications described in subparagraph (A) is not immediately available for the LEP beneficiary.

(ii) If the LEP beneficiary specifically requests that the accompanying adult interpret or facilitate communication, the accompanying adult agrees to provide that assistance, and reliance on that accompanying adult for that assistance is appropriate under the circumstances.

(2) Translation services shall be provided to the language groups identified by the department.

(3) Written notice of the availability of free language assistance services shall be provided in English and in the top 15 languages spoken by
 LEP individuals in California, as determined by the department, and consistent with the requirements identified in Part 92 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 1557 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 18116).

(b) The department shall determine when an LEP population meets the requirement for translation services using one of the following numeric thresholds:

(1) A population group of at least 3,000 or 5 percent of the beneficiary population, whichever is fewer, mandatory managed care Medi-Cal beneficiaries, residing in the service area, who indicate their primary language as other than English.

(2) A population group of mandatory managed care Medi-Cal beneficiaries, residing in the service area, who indicate their primary language as other than English, and
 that meet a concentration standard of 1,000 beneficiaries in a single ZIP Code or 1,500 beneficiaries in two contiguous ZIP Codes.

(c) The department shall make this determination if any of the following occurs:

(1) A nonmanaged care county becomes a new managed care county.

(2) A new population group becomes a mandatory Medi-Cal managed care beneficiary population.

(3) A period of three years has passed since the last determination.

(d) The department shall instruct managed care plans, by means of incorporating the requirement into plan contracts, all-plan letters, or similar instructions, of the language groups that meet the numeric thresholds.

(e) A managed care plan shall notify beneficiaries, prospective beneficiaries, and members of the public of all of the following information:

(1) The availability of language assistance services, including oral interpretation and translated written materials, free of charge and in a timely manner, when those services are necessary to provide meaningful access to health care programs or activities to LEP beneficiaries.

(2) The availability of appropriate auxiliary aids and services, including qualified interpreters for individuals with disabilities and information in alternate formats, free of charge and in a timely manner, when those aids and services are necessary to ensure an equal opportunity to participate for individuals with disabilities.

(3) A managed
 care plan does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, ancestry, religion, sex, marital status, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, or disability.

(4) The availability of a grievance procedure and how to file a grievance, including identification of, and contact information for, the designated managed care plan representative.

(5) How to file a discrimination complaint with the United States Department of Health and Human Services Office for Civil Rights if there is a concern of discrimination based on race, color, national origin, age, disability, or sex.

(f) (1) The information described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (e) shall be provided in the following manner:

(A) In
 the evidence of coverage.

(B) Posted in conspicuous physical locations where the managed care plan interacts with the public.

(C) On the internet website published and maintained by the managed care plan in a manner that allows a beneficiary, prospective beneficiary, and members of the public to easily locate the information.

(2) To the extent the information described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (e) is not included in existing informational notices, a managed care plan shall add this information at the time of the next regularly scheduled update of the applicable publication.

(g) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall be implemented by the department only to the extent that federal
 financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(h) This section does not apply to mental health plans contracting with the department pursuant to Section 14712.

(i) For purposes of this section, a person is “limited-English-proficient” if the person speaks English less than very well.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 314.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14029.92.

(a) The department shall notify Medi-Cal beneficiaries, prospective beneficiaries, and members of the public of all of the following information:

(1) The availability of language assistance services, including oral interpretation and translated written materials, free of charge and in a timely manner, when those services are necessary to provide meaningful access to individuals with limited English proficiency.

(2) The availability of appropriate auxiliary aids and services, including qualified interpreters for individuals with disabilities and information in alternate formats, free of charge and in a timely manner, when those aids and services are necessary to ensure an equal opportunity to
 participate for individuals with disabilities.

(3) The department does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, ancestry, religion, sex, marital status, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, or disability.

(4) The availability of the grievance procedure and how to file a grievance, including identification of, and contact information for, the designated department representative.

(5) How to file a discrimination complaint with the United States Department of Health and Human Services Office for Civil Rights if there is a concern of discrimination based on race, color, national origin, age, disability, or sex.

(b) Written notice of the availability of free language assistance services shall be provided in English and in
 the top 15 languages spoken by limited-English-proficient individuals in California, as determined by the department, and consistent with the requirements identified in Part 92 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 1557 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 18116).

(c) (1) The information described in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be provided in the following manner:

(A) In the department’s Medi-Cal informational publications.

(B) Posted in conspicuous physical locations where the department interacts with the public.

(C) On the department’s Internet Web site, in a manner that allows beneficiaries, prospective beneficiaries, and members of the public to easily locate the
 information.

(2) To the extent the information described in subdivisions (a) and (b) is not included in existing informational notices, the department shall add this information at the time of the next regularly scheduled update of the applicable publication.

(d) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 235.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14040.

(a) Each contract for fiscal intermediary services shall allow, to the extent practicable, providers to utilize electronic means for transmitting claims to the fiscal intermediary contractor. Means of transmission, and the manner and format used, shall be approved by the director. In determining which electronic means are
 acceptable, the director shall consider magnetic tape, computer-to-computer via telephone, diskettes, and any other methods which may become available through technological advancements. 

(b) A provider, as defined in Section 14043.1, may assign signature authority for transmission of claims to the provider’s authorized representative or the registered billing agent of the provider identified to the department pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14040.5.

(c) The department shall develop reasonable standards for participation and continued participation by providers and billing agents in the use of claims transmission methods utilized pursuant to this section. These standards shall be designed to ensure that providers and billing agents submit technically complete claims and to reduce the potential for fraud and abuse. The department shall notify providers and billing agents of
 any planned changes to the claims transmission standards prior to the implementation of the changes. A “technically complete claim” means any billing request for payment from a provider or the billing agent of the provider, including an original claim, claim inquiry, or appeal, that is submitted on the correct Medi-Cal claim form or electronic billing format, is fully and accurately completed, and includes all information and documentation required to be submitted on or with the claim pursuant to Medi-Cal billing and documentation requirements.

(d) To the extent required by federal and state law, the fiscal intermediary shall retain claim data submitted by providers or the billing agent of the provider pursuant to this section. The department shall, however, return to a provider or the billing agent of the provider original tapes, diskettes, and any other similar devices that are used by the provider or the billing agent of the provider
 pursuant to this section.

(e) In order to reduce the amount of paperwork or attachments which are required to be completed by a provider or the billing agent of the provider submitting a claim for reimbursement under this chapter to the fiscal intermediary, the department shall direct the fiscal intermediary to investigate and develop the means to incorporate as much information as possible on the electronic format.

(f) Each provider and billing agent submitting claims shall be responsible for ensuring that each claim submitted for reimbursement for services, goods, supplies, or merchandise rendered or supplied by the provider to a Medi-Cal beneficiary or under the Medi-Cal program meets the standards established by the department pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14040.1.

(a) “Billing agent” or “billing agent of the provider” means any individual, partnership, group, association, corporation, institution, or entity, and the officers, directors, owners, managing employees, or agents of any partnership, group, association, corporation, institution, or entity, that submits claims on behalf of the
 provider, as defined in Section 14043.1, for reimbursement for services, goods, supplies, or merchandise rendered or provided directly or indirectly to a Medi-Cal beneficiary or under the Medi-Cal program. As used in this section a billing agent shall not include an authorized representative of a provider billing solely for that provider, a provider wholly owned entity billing solely for the provider, or a clinic licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code or exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code when preparing and submitting claims for services provided on behalf of the clinic. For purposes of this subdivision, an authorized representative shall be either an individual who is an employee of the provider or an individual with a familial relationship to the provider. For purposes of this section and Section 14040.5, an authorized representative, a provider wholly owned entity billing solely for the provider, or a
 clinic that is licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code or exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, when preparing and submitting claims for services provided on behalf of the clinic, shall be considered a provider.

(b) The department shall establish standards for the registration or continued registration of each billing agent. The standards shall establish time periods, no longer than a year from the date the standards become effective, after which, no billing agent shall submit a claim on behalf of a provider, as defined in Section 14043.1, for reimbursement for services, goods, supplies, or merchandise rendered or provided directly or indirectly by the provider to a Medi-Cal beneficiary or under the Medi-Cal program, unless that billing agent has been registered with the department. The department shall establish the standards for the
 registration or continued registration of billing agents pursuant to this subdivision, in consultation with interested parties, by the adoption of emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of these emergency regulations or readoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted or readopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this subdivision shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations.

(c) The department may complete a background check on applicants for registration or continued registration as a billing agent, for the purpose of verifying the accuracy of information provided by an applicant for registration or continued registration as a billing agent or in order to prevent fraud and abuse. The background check may include, but not be limited to, onsite inspection, review of business records, and data searches.

(d) As a condition of registration, or continued registration, as a billing agent, an applicant for registration as a billing agent shall provide to the department a surety bond of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). This subdivision shall become operative only if the director executes a declaration, that shall be retained by the director, stating that the surety bonds described in this paragraph are commercially offered throughout the state and
 by more than one vendor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14040.5.

(a) A provider may, by written contract, do either of the following:

(1) Authorize a billing agent to submit claims, including electronic claims, on behalf of the provider for reimbursement for services, goods, supplies, or merchandise provided by the provider
 to the Medi-Cal program or a Medi-Cal beneficiary.

(2) Assign signature authority for transmission of the claims by the authorized billing agent.

(b) If a contract as described in subdivision (a) is entered into, the contract shall meet the requirements of Section 447.10 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or shall have been approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration for purposes of the Medicare program.

(c) Any provider intending to use a billing agent to submit claims for reimbursements to the Medi-Cal program shall provide, at least 30 days prior to the submission of any claims for reimbursement by the billing agent, written notification to the director of the name, including known legal and any known fictitious or “doing business as” names used by the billing agent, the address, and
 the telephone number of the billing agent.

(d) Billing agents shall register with the director and shall obtain a unique identifier prior to submitting any claims for reimbursement. This unique identifier shall be part of each claim for reimbursement submitted by the billing agent.

(e) (1) Any Medi-Cal claim submitted by a billing agent or provider failing to comply with the requirements of this section or Section 14040 or 14040.1, or the regulations adopted pursuant to these sections, shall be subject to denial by the director.

(2) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke the registration or continued registration of a billing agent based upon any of the following grounds:

(A) Failure of the billing agent to comply with this
 section or Section 14040.1 or the regulations adopted under these sections.

(B) Involvement of a billing agent in illegal submission of claims.

(C) The billing agent is under investigation for fraud or abuse, as defined in Section 14043.1, by the department or any federal, state, or local law enforcement agency.

(3) The director may immediately revoke or suspend the registration or continued registration of a billing agent upon the involvement of that billing agent in the filing of false or misleading information on claims submitted for services allegedly rendered, or when a billing agent has demonstrated a pattern of filing claims that are not technically complete claims as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 14040. The director shall not take action to revoke or suspend a billing agent’s registration or continued
 registration when the falsity or misleading nature of the information was the result of the provider’s actions and not the billing agent’s.

(4) Proceedings for suspension or revocation of the registration or continued registration of a billing agent pursuant to this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that hearings may be conducted by departmental hearing officers appointed by the director. The director may periodically contract with the Office of Administrative Hearings to conduct these hearings.

(5) The director shall provide written notification outlining the reasons for the proposed action to the billing agent 30 days in advance of a proposed suspension or revocation and shall allow the billing agent to demonstrate within those 30 days by comment why the
 suspension or revocation notice should not be issued.

(6) If after consideration of the billing agent’s comment, the director determines that the suspension or revocation is nonetheless warranted, the director shall notify the billing agent of the suspension or revocation and the effective date thereof and at the same time shall serve the billing agent with an accusation. In addition, the director shall send each provider utilizing the services of the billing agent written notice of the suspension or revocation of the billing agent. The suspension or revocation of the billing agent shall take effect 15 days from the date of the notification of the billing agent and service of the accusation. To the extent allowed by federal law, the director may waive any claims submission requirement to assist a provider in submitting or resubmitting claims to the Medi-Cal program when they are delayed because of a billing agent’s suspension or revocation.
 Upon receipt of a notice of defense by the billing agent, the director shall set the matter for hearing within 30 days of the receipt of the notice. The suspension or revocation shall remain in effect until the hearing is completed and the director has made a final determination on the merits. The suspension or revocation shall, however, be deemed vacated if the director fails to make a final determination on the merits within 60 days of the completion of the original hearing.

(7) Paragraph (4) of this subdivision shall not apply where the suspension or revocation of a billing agent is based upon the conviction for any crime involving fraud, abuse of the Medi-Cal program, or suspension from the federal Medicare or medicaid programs, or where the billing agent has entered into a settlement in lieu of conviction for fraud or abuse in any government program, within the previous 10 years. In those instances, suspension or revocation shall be
 automatic and not subject to administrative appeal or hearing. In those instances, the director shall send each provider utilizing the services of the billing agent written notice of the automatic suspension or revocation of the billing agent. To the extent allowed by federal law, the director may waive any claims submission requirement to assist a provider in submitting or resubmitting claims to the Medi-Cal program when they are delayed because of a billing agent’s automatic suspension or revocation.

(8) Notwithstanding Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code, proceedings for the denial of the registration of a billing agent pursuant to this section shall be conducted in accordance with Section 14043.65. This subdivision shall not apply where the denial is based upon conviction of any crime involving fraud or abuse of the Medi-Cal program or the federal medicaid or Medicare programs, or exclusion by the federal government from the
 medicaid or Medicare programs. In this case, the denial shall be automatic and not subject to administrative appeal or hearing.

(f) For purposes of this section, “billing agent” has the same meaning as defined in Section 14040.1.

(g) As used in this section “provider” has the same meaning as defined in Section 14043.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.

(a) The director shall develop and implement standards for the timely processing and payment of each claim type. The standards shall be sufficient to meet minimal federal requirements for the timely processing of claims.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that claim forms for use by physicians and hospitals
 be the same as claim forms in general use by other payors, including Medicare, to the extent compatible with the following:

(1) Requirements for maximum federal matching funds.

(2) The reasonable needs of the mechanized claims processing system.

(3) Maximum billing efficiency.

(4) The convenience of providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 996, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and to the extent not otherwise conflicting with federal law, the department may hold for a period of one month, or direct the medical fiscal intermediary for the Medi-Cal program to hold for a period of one month,
 payments to providers or their designated agents for health care services that are provided pursuant to this chapter, and payments to entities that contract with the department pursuant to this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) and Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591) for the delivery of health care services.

(b) The authority described in subdivision (a) shall be limited to payments for one month only, and only for a month ending prior to June 30, 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 367, Sec. 9.   (AB 574)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.5.
